Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1308
Other intangible property; general-use prepaid card; presumed abandoned; when.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all intangible personal property, not otherwise covered by the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, including any income or increment thereon after deducting any lawful charges, that is held or owing in this state in the ordinary course of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after it became payable or distributable, is presumed abandoned.

(b) The unredeemed value of a general-use prepaid card, including any income or increment thereon after deducting any lawful charges, that is held or owing in this state in the ordinary course of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after the last transaction initiated by the card owner, is presumed abandoned.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 8, p. 2483;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 173, § 4.